Virginia statutes. Title 45.2. Mines, Minerals, and Energy.
Article 4. Roof, Face, and Rib Control.

§ 45.2-709.
Roof, face, and ribs to be secure.

All underground active workings and travel ways shall be secured and controlled to protect miners from a fall of roof, face, or ribs. Loose roof and any loose or overhanging ribs or face shall be taken down or supported.

The mining method that the mine operator follows shall not expose any miner to a hazardous condition caused by the excessive width of a room or entry, a faulty pillar-recovery method, or any other hazardous mining method or working condition.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 45-68.1 to 45-68.3; 1954, c. 191; 1966, c. 594, §§ 45.1-40, 45.1-41; 1975, c. 520; 1978, cc. 118, 729; 1980, c. 338; 1982, c. 234; 1984, c. 590; 1988, c. 577; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.108; 1996, c. 774; 1999, c. 256; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-710.
Roof control plans.

Each underground coal mine shall have a roof control plan approved by the Chief. Each plan shall include (i) a minimum standard for adequately controlling the roof, face, and ribs; (ii) a description of mining methods used; (iii) a listing and specification of roof and rib support materials; (iv) instruction for the installation of temporary and permanent roof supports; (v) a description of any pillar recovery methods; (vi) applicable drawings that demonstrate the width of each opening, each roof support installation sequence, and each pillar recovery sequence; and (vii) any additional requirements deemed necessary by the Chief. The initial submission of any roof control plan shall include maps of mine projections, overlying and underlying mine workings, coal contours, and surface contours. If changes are to be made in the mining system that necessitate any change in the roof control plan, the plan shall be revised and approved by the Chief prior to implementing the new mining system.

The Chief shall, where he deems necessary, prescribe adequate minimum standards for systematic support of mine roof, suitable to the roof conditions and mining system of each mine. Such standards shall be incorporated into an approved roof control plan for the mine.

Failure to comply with the approved roof control plan for the mine shall constitute a violation of this section.

The approved roof control plan shall be posted conspicuously at the mine and a copy shall be available at each working section of the mine.

The minimum standards and plan shall provide for temporary support at all active workings, without regard to natural condition.

If the minimum standards do not afford adequate protection, such additional supports shall be installed as necessary. Such additional supports shall be described in the plan.

This section shall not apply to any roof control system installed prior to January 27, 1988, so long as the support system continues to effectively control the roof, face, and ribs.

History.

Code 1950, § 45-68.2; 1954, c. 191; 1966, c. 594, § 45.1-40; 1975, c. 520; 1978, c. 729; 1984, c. 590; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.109; 1999, c. 256; 2005, c. 3; 2011, cc. 826, 862; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, c. 3, cl. 3 provides: “That the Department of Mines, Minerals and Energy shall promulgate, within 280 days of the enactment of this act, amendments to 4 VAC 25-130-816.11 requiring coal mine permit boundary markers located on steep slopes above private dwellings or other occupied buildings to be made or marked with fluorescent or reflective paint or material, and amendments to 4 VAC 25-130-816.64 requiring all persons conducting blasting operations on coal mines occurring within 1,000 feet of a private dwelling or occupied building to conduct seismic monitoring of the blasting.”

Acts 2005, c. 3, cl. 4 provides: “That an emergency exists and this act is in force from its passage [February 10, 2005].”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 13 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”

§ 45.2-711.
Instruction of miners.

The operator or his agent shall instruct all miners in the removal and installation of temporary and permanent roof supports as may be required by the roof control plan.

History.

Code 1950, § 45-68.2; 1954, c. 191; 1966, c. 594, § 45.1-40; 1975, c. 520; 1978, c. 729; 1984, c. 590; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.109; 1999, c. 256; 2005, c. 3; 2011, cc. 826, 862; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, c. 3, cl. 4 provides: “That an emergency exists and this act is in force from its passage [February 10, 2005].”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 13 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”

§ 45.2-712.
Copies of plan.

The operator or his agent shall, upon request, furnish a copy of the roof control plan to any miner engaged in removing or installing a temporary or permanent roof support.

History.

Code 1950, § 45-68.2; 1954, c. 191; 1966, c. 594, § 45.1-40; 1975, c. 520; 1978, c. 729; 1984, c. 590; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.111; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-713.
Automated temporary roof support systems.

The Chief shall adopt regulations requiring automated temporary roof support systems for the installation of roof bolts.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 45-68.1, 45-68.3; 1954, c. 191; 1966, c. 594, § 45.1-41; 1975, c. 520; 1978, c. 118; 1980, c. 338; 1982, c. 234; 1988, c. 577; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.114; 1999, c. 256; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-714.
Supplies of materials for supports.

The operator or his agent shall provide at or near each working place an ample supply of suitable materials of proper size with which to secure the roof, face, and ribs of such working place in a safe manner. Suitable supply materials shall be provided for variations in seam height. If the operator or his agent fails to provide such suitable materials, the mine foreman shall cause all miners to withdraw from the mine, or the portion thereof affected, until such materials or supplies are received.

Safety posts, jacks, or temporary crossbars shall be set close to the face before other operations are begun and as needed thereafter if any miner goes inby the last permanent roof support.

Unless an automated temporary roof support system is used, safety posts or jacks shall be used to protect miners during removal of roof material, installation of crossbars, drilling of roof bolt holes, installation of roof bolts, or performance of any other work that would reasonably require roof support to protect the miners involved.

The operator or his agent shall make immediately available for emergency use at each mine site at least two lifting devices with a combined total of at least 80 tons lifting capacity. Each individual lifting device shall have 20 tons or greater lifting capacity.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 45-68.1, 45-68.3; 1954, c. 191; 1966, c. 594, § 45.1-41; 1975, c. 520; 1978, c. 118; 1980, c. 338; 1982, c. 234; 1988, c. 577; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.115; 1996, c. 774; 1999, c. 256; 2005, c. 3; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, c. 3, cl. 4 provides: “That an emergency exists and this act is in force from its passage [February 10, 2005].”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 13 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”

§ 45.2-715.
Examination and testing of roof, face, and ribs.

The operator or his agent shall instruct every miner on how to visually examine and conduct sound and vibration testing of roof, face, and ribs.

Any miner exposed to danger from a fall of roof, face, or ribs shall visually examine and, if conditions permit, test the roof, face, and ribs by sounding the roof before starting work or before starting a machine and as needed thereafter to ensure safety. If hazardous conditions are found, the miner discovering such conditions shall either (i) correct the conditions immediately by taking down the loose material, installing proper timbering, or installing proper roof support before work is continued or any other work is done or (ii) cause all miners to vacate the place.

At least once each shift, or more often if necessary, the mine foreman or other certified person shall examine and test the roof, face, and ribs of each active working section where coal is being produced while one or more miners are working in such section. Any place in which a hazardous condition is found by the mine foreman shall be made safe in his presence or under his direction or all miners shall be withdrawn from such place. Such hazardous condition and corrective actions taken shall be recorded in the on-shift record book at the mine.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 45-61, 45-68.1; 1954, c. 191; 1966, c. 594, § 45.1-42; 1976, c. 598; 1978, c. 118; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.116; 1996, c. 774; 1999, c. 256; 2005, c. 3; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, c. 3, cl. 4 provides: “That an emergency exists and this act is in force from its passage [February 10, 2005].”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 13 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”

§ 45.2-716.
Mapping of roof falls.

Any unplanned roof fall that is required to be reported in accordance with §

45.2-556

shall be marked on a map maintained at the mine to indicate the specific location of the fall.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 45-61, 45-68.1; 1954, c. 191; 1966, c. 594, § 45.1-42; 1976, c. 598; 1978, c. 118; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.117; 1999, c. 256; 2005, c. 3; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, c. 3, cl. 4 provides: “That an emergency exists and this act is in force from its passage [February 10, 2005].”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 13 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”

§ 45.2-717.
Unsafe conditions.

No person shall work or travel under unsupported roof except to install temporary supports in accordance with the approved roof control plan. Any area inby the breaker line where second mining has been or is being conducted shall be considered unsupported.

If roof, face, or rib conditions are found to be unsafe, no person shall start any other work in the area where such conditions exist until the conditions have been corrected by taking down loose material or securely supporting the roof, face, or ribs pursuant to subsection B of §

45.2-715

.

A bar of proper length shall be used to pull down any loose material discovered.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 45-61, 45-68.1, 45-68.3; 1954, c. 191; 1966, c. 594, §§ 45.1-41, 45.1-42; 1975, c. 520; 1976, c. 598; 1978, c. 118; 1980, c. 338; 1982, c. 234; 1988, c. 577; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.118; 1999, c. 256; 2005, c. 3; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, c. 3, cl. 4 provides: “That an emergency exists and this act is in force from its passage [February 10, 2005].”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 13 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”

§ 45.2-718.
Removal of supports.

No person shall deliberately remove any support in an active area unless equivalent protection is provided.

Any person who accidentally knocks out or dislodges a support shall promptly replace the support.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 45-68.1, 45-68.3; 1954, c. 191; 1966, c. 594, § 45.1-41; 1975, c. 520; 1978, c. 118; 1980, c. 338; 1982, c. 234; 1988, c. 577; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.119; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.